Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2433.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-12-23.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-12 entitled
"Department of Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-12-23.1. Quality of early care and education and school-age child care through
voluntary quality rating system.
(a) There is hereby established a voluntary quality rating system which will assess quality
in early care and education programs and school-age child care. For purposes of this section, early
care and education programs and school-age child care shall mean programs licensed under chapter
12.5 of title 42 and approved under chapter 48 of title 16, including, without limitation, childcare
centers, family childcare homes, group family childcare homes, school-age childcare programs and
preschools, but excluding child placement agencies. The voluntary quality rating system is
established to promote continuous quality improvement of programs and to further the goals of
Rhode Island’s “starting right” initiative.
(b) The department of human services, the department of children, youth and families, the
department of health, the department of elementary and secondary education, and other partners
and agencies shall share information and work cooperatively with the Rhode Island quality rating
system, a public-private partnership, to ensure that Rhode Island children have access to quality
early care and education programs and school-age child care.
(c) The voluntary quality rating system shall also provide a mechanism to gather data about

program quality, and shall report this information to parents, providers, and other persons interested
in the quality of early care and education programs and school-age childcare services in Rhode
Island.
(d) School building presumption for facility-based rating elements.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of the voluntary quality rating system established
in this section, when a school-age child care program is operated within a RIDE-certified school
building, any facility-based element of any observational tool or environment rating scale used by
the Rhode Island quality rating system to assess such program including, without limitation, the
School-Age Care Environment Rating Scale (SACERS) or any successor or replacement tool, shall
be deemed met or otherwise treated as neutral for the purpose of determining the program's quality
rating level.
(2) The requirement in subsection (d)(1) of this section shall apply to any facility-based
element including, but not limited to, items, indicators, components, or scoring elements relating
to room arrangement, space configuration, furnishings, fixtures, storage, building systems, indoor
or outdoor space characteristics, and staff-only spaces.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to waive, diminish, or otherwise affect:
(i) Any licensure requirement applicable to child care centers or school-age child care
programs;
(ii) Any health and safety requirement applicable to the program; or
(iii) The authority of the department of children, youth and families, the department of
health, the state fire marshal, the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education,
or any other state agency to enforce applicable laws and regulations.
(e) Definitions.
As used in subsections (d) and (f) of this section, the following terms shall have the
meanings set forth below:
(2) "RIDE-certified school building" means a building located in the state that is used
primarily to provide kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) instruction by:
(i) A local education agency (LEA) or public school district;
(ii) A charter public school; or
(iii) An approved non-public school; and
(iv) That is subject to oversight by the Rhode Island department of elementary and
secondary education and the council on elementary and secondary education, including applicable
health and safety requirements and standards under the basic education program pursuant to § 16-
22-34, or other governance structure approved by the Rhode Island department of elementary and
LC004914 - Page 2 of 4

secondary education.
(1) "Facility-based element" means any item, indicator, component, scoring element, or
sub-element within an observational tool or environment rating scale used by the Rhode Island
quality rating system that assesses, rates, or scores the physical environment, space, layout,
furnishings, fixtures, storage, building systems, or staff-only spaces.
(3) "School-age child care" and "school-age child care program" shall have the same
meaning as set forth in subsection (a) of this section including, without limitation, school-age child
care programs licensed under chapter 12.5 of title 42 and approved under chapter 48 of title 16.
(f) Implementation - Guidance - Contracts.
The department of human services shall, in consultation with the Rhode Island department
of elementary and secondary education and any other partner agencies participating in the Rhode
Island quality rating system, ensure implementation of subsection (d) of this section not later than
one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this subsection. Such implementation shall
include, as applicable, updates to standards, scoring practices, guidance to observers, and
contractual requirements for any entity administering, coordinating, or conducting assessments for
the Rhode Island quality rating system.
SECTION 2. Severability.
If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of the act shall not be
affected thereby.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004914
========
LC004914 - Page 3 of 4